Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1923
Voluntary surrender of license.

A licensee may voluntarily surrender the license issued under the Child Care Licensing Act at any time, except that the department may refuse to accept a voluntary surrender of a license if the licensee is under investigation or if the department has initiated disciplinary action against the licensee.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 86.